da: Skafttype for symaskine: Højt skaft; Højt industriskaft; Langt skaft; Lavt skaft; Skråt skaft; Andet
it: Tipo di gambale per macchina da cucire: Attacco alto; Attacco alto industriale; Attacco lungo; Attacco basso; Attacco inclinato; Altro
ro-RO: Tip de tijă pentru mașina de cusut: Tijă înaltă; Tijă înaltă industrială; Tijă lungă; Tijă scurtă; Tijă înclinată; Altele
zh-TW: 縫紉機柄部類型: 高壓腳柄; 工業高壓腳柄; 長壓腳柄; 低壓腳柄; 斜壓腳柄; 其他
nl: Type naaimachineschacht: Hoge schacht; Industriële hoge schacht; Lange schacht; Lage schacht; Schuine schacht; Overig
de: Schaftart der Nähmaschinennadeln: Hoher Schaft; Hoher Schaft (Industrie); Langer Schaft; Niedriger Schaft; Schrägschaft; Andere
sv: Symaskin – typ av fäste för pressarfot: Högt fäste; Industriellt högt fäste; Långt fäste; Lågt fäste; Vinklat fäste; Övrigt
sl-SI: Vrsta stebla šivalnega stroja: Visoko steblo; Industrijsko visoko steblo; Dolgo steblo; Nizko steblo; Poševno steblo; Drugo
fr: Type de tige de machine à coudre: Tige haute; Tige haute industrielle; Tige longue; Tige basse; Tige inclinée; Autre
sk-SK: Typ stopky šijacieho stroja: Vysoká stopka; Priemyselná vysoká stopka; Dlhá stopka; Nízka stopka; Šikmá stopka; Iné
pl: Typ uchwytu do stopek w maszynie do szycia: Wysoki uchwyt; Przemysłowy wysoki uchwyt; Długi uchwyt; Niski uchwyt; Pochyły uchwyt; Inne
pt-BR: Máquina de costura, tipo de haste: Haste alta; Haste alta industrial; Haste longa; Haste baixa; Haste inclinada; Outra
th: ประเภทก้านตีนผีจักรเย็บผ้า: ก้านสูง; ก้านสูงอุตสาหกรรม; ก้านยาว; ก้านต่ำ; ก้านเอียง; อื่นๆ
ko: 재봉틀 노루발대 유형: 하이 생크; 산업용 하이 생크; 롱 생크; 로우 생크; 슬랜트 생크; 기타
cs: Typ stopky šicího stroje: Vysoká patka; Průmyslová vysoká patka; Dlouhá patka; Nízká patka; Zkosená patka; Jiné
ru: Тип хвостовика иглы: Высокий стержень; Промышленный высокий стержень; Длинный стержень; Низкий стержень; Наклонный стержень; Другое
zh-CN: 缝纫机机柄类型: 高柄; 工业高柄; 长柄; 低柄; 斜柄; 其他
hu: Varrógép szár típusa: Magas szárú; Ipari magas szárú; Hosszú szárú; Alacsony szárú; Döntött szárú; Egyéb
el: Τύπος στελέχους ραπτομηχανής: Ψηλό ποδαράκι; Βιομηχανικό ψηλό ποδαράκι; Μακρύ ποδαράκι; Κοντό ποδαράκι; Λοξό ποδαράκι; Άλλο
bg-BG: Тип стебло на игла за шевна машина: Високо краче (high shank); Индустриално високо краче; Дълго краче; Ниско краче; Наклонено краче; Друго
lt-LT: Siuvimo mašinos kotelio tipas: Aukštas kotas; Pramoninis aukštas kotas; Ilgas kotas; Žemas kotas; Pasviręs kotas; Kita
nb: Skafttype for symaskin: Høyt skaft; Industrielt høyt skaft; Langt skaft; Lavt skaft; Skrått skaft; Annet
pt-PT: Tipo de haste da máquina de costura: Haste alta; Haste alta industrial; Haste longa; Haste baixa; Haste inclinada; Outro
tr: Dikiş makinesi ayak bağlantı tipi: Yüksek tutucu; Endüstriyel yüksek tutucu; Uzun tutucu; Alçak tutucu; Eğimli tutucu; Diğer
es: Tipo de vástago de la máquina de coser: Vástago alto; Vástago alto industrial; Vástago largo; Vástago bajo; Vástago inclinado; Otro
fi: Ompelukoneen varsityyppi: Korkea varsi; Teollisuuskoneen korkea varsi; Pitkä varsi; Matala varsi; Vino varsi; Muu
ja: ミシンシャンクタイプ: ハイシャンク; 工業用ハイシャンク; ロングシャンク; ローシャンク; スラントシャンク; その他
hr-HR: Vrsta drške igle šivaćeg stroja: Visoki nosač; Industrijski visoki nosač; Dugi nosač; Niski nosač; Kosi nosač; Ostalo
vi: Loại trụ kim của máy may: Chân vịt cao; Chân vịt cao công nghiệp; Chân vịt dài; Chân vịt thấp; Chân vịt nghiêng; Khác
en: Sewing machine shank type: High shank; Industrial high shank; Long shank; Low shank; Slant shank; Other